src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@ilmuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ilmuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ilustav+A:ilustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ilutsev+A:ilutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
imeteldav+A:imeteldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
imetletav+A:imetletav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
imetlev+A:imetlev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
imiteeriv+A:imit˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
immitsev+A:immitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
imponeeriv+A:impon˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
informeeriv+A:inform˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
intervjueeritav+A:intervjueeritav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
intrigeeriv+A:intrig˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
irisev+A:irisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
irvitav+A:irvitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@istuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘istuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jaatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘aatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
jagatav+A:jagatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jagav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@jagav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jaguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@jaguv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
jahmatav+A:jahmatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jahtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ahtiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
jalutav+A:jalutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
jaotatav+A:j˘aotatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jaotav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘aotav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jaotuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘aotuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@johtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ohtuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jonklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘onklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@joodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘oodav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
joovastav+A:joovastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
juhatav+A:juhatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
juhendav+A:juhendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
juhitav+A:juhitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@juhtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘uhtiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@juhtuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘uhtuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
julgustav+A:julgustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
jutustav+A:jutustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
juubeldav+A:juubeldav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
juuritav+A:juuritav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
jõllitav+A:jõlʲlitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jõustuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘õustuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
jälestav+A:jälestav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
jälgitav+A:j˘älʲgitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jälgiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘älʲgiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
jälitatav+A:jälitatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@järgnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ärgnev MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jätkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ätkuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jäädav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘äädav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jääv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ääv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
kaalutlev+A:kaalutlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaaluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aaluv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaasnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aasnev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kaduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaebav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aebav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahanev+A:kahanev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kahetsetav+A:kahetsetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahetsev+A:kahetsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahjustav+A:kahjustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kahtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ahtlev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kahtlustatav+A:kahtlustatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kahtlustav+A:kahtlustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaitstav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aitstav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kalduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘alduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kandideeriv+A:kanʲdid˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kanduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘anduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kannatav+A:kannatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kantav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘antav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
karastav+A:karastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
karistatav+A:karistatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
karistav+A:karistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@karjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘arjuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
karvendav+A:karvendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasutav+A:kasutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kasvatatav+A:kasvatatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kasvatav+A:kasvatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kasvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘asvav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@katkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘atkev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kattuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘attuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kaubeldav+A:kaubeldav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kaugenev+A:kaugenev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kaunistav+A:kaunistav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kauplev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘auplev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kavandatav+A:kavandatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eelav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keelduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eelduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
keelustav+A:keelustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keerlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eerlev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
keerutav+A:keerutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eev%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
kehtestav+A:kehtestav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kehtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ehtiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kehv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ehv%>%{pl.i%} PIIM  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kelkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘elʲkiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kenitlev+A:kenitlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kergendav+A:kergendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kerjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘erjav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kerkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘erkiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kestendav+A:kestendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ketendav+A:ketendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kiduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kihisev+A:kihisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kihutav+A:kihutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kiidetav+A:kiidetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiirgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iirgav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiirguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iirguv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiirustav+A:kiirustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iiskav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiitlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iitlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kikitav+A:kikitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kilav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kilgendav+A:kilgendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kinnitav+A:kinʲnitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kippuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ippuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kiratsev+A:kiratsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kirev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kirev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kirjeldatav+A:kirjeldatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
kirjeldav+A:kirjeldav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
kirjutav+A:kirjutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kisendav+A:kisendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiskuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iskuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiunuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iunuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiusav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iusav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@klantsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl˘anʲtsiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kleepuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl˘eepuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kloppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kl˘oppiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kobrutav+A:kobrutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kogunev+A:kogunev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kogutav+A:kogutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kohaldatav+A:kohaldatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kohev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kohev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kohisev+A:kohisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohustav+A:kohustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kohutav+A:kohutav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kohuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@kohuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
koketeeriv+A:koket˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kolksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘olksuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kollendav+A:kollendav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
konkureeriv+A:konkur˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kontakteeruv+A:kontakt˘eeruv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kontrollitav+A:kontrˈolʲlitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
kontrolliv+A:kontr˘olʲliv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@koolev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oolE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
koolitatav+A:koolʲitatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
koondatav+A:k˘oondatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@koondav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oondav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
